Louisiana, session 2026, SB346.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S.17:416.14.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.14.1. Deepfake material; prohibition
A. No student, faculty member, member of the administrative staff, or
other employee at an elementary or secondary school shall use material
considered to be a deepfake against a student enrolled in kindergarten through
grade twelve, with the intent to coerce, harass, intimidate, or maliciously
disseminate or sell the material.
B. For the purposes of this Section, "deepfake" means any audio or
visual media in an electronic format, including any motion picture film or video
recording, that is created, altered, or digitally manipulated in a manner that
would falsely appear to a reasonable observer to be an authentic record of the
actual speech or conduct of the individual or that replaces an individual's
likeness with another individual as depicted in the recording. "Deepfake" does
not include any material that constitutes a work of political, public interest, or
newsworthy value, including commentary, criticism, satire, or parody, or that
includes content, context, or a clear disclosure visible throughout the duration
of the recording that would cause a reasonable person to understand that the
audio or visual media is not a record of a real event.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 346 ENROLLED
C. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in
collaboration with the state Department of Education, shall develop and adopt
rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.